Utah statutes.
65A-8-306.   Heritage Trees Advisory Committee -- Members -- Officers -- Expenses -- Functions.

(1)  There is created a Heritage Trees Advisory Committee composed of five persons appointed by the division from among persons who are members of the Utah Community Forestry Council.

(2) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (2)(b), as terms of current committee members expire, the division shall appoint each new member or reappointed member to a four-year term.

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (2)(a), the division shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of committee members are staggered so that approximately half of the committee is appointed every two years.

(3)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.

(4) (a)  The committee shall elect a chair who is responsible to call and conduct meetings.

(b)  Three members present at a duly called meeting constitute a quorum for the transaction of official business.

(c)  Members of the committee may meet as often as considered necessary.

(d)  The urban forestry staff person of the division shall serve as secretary to the committee.

(5)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(6)  The committee shall:

(a)  publish guidelines for division use in granting or denying applications for the designation of heritage trees;

(b)  publish an annual register of designated heritage trees and distribute it to public utilities, tree service companies, municipal forestry and parks departments, and the public; and

(c)  develop a system for visibly identifying designated heritage trees.

